Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.220

Scrap theft alert system. (Effective until April 1, 2025.)

(1) Law enforcement agencies may register with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of private, nonferrous, or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area.

(2) Any business licensed under this chapter shall:

(a) Sign up with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of private, nonferrous, or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area;

(b) Download the scrap metal theft alerts generated by the scrap theft alert system on a daily basis;

(c) Use the alerts to identify potentially stolen commercial metal property, nonferrous metal property, and private metal property; and

(d) Maintain for ninety days copies of any theft alerts received and downloaded pursuant to this section.

[ 2013 c 322 s 25.]

PDFRCW 19.290.220

Scrap theft alert system. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

(1) Law enforcement agencies may register with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of nonferrous or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area.

(2) Any business licensed under this chapter shall:

(a) Sign up with the scrap theft alert system that is maintained and provided at no charge to users by the institute of scrap recycling industries, incorporated, or its successor organization, to receive alerts regarding thefts of nonferrous or commercial metal property in the relevant geographic area;

(b) Download the scrap metal theft alerts generated by the scrap theft alert system on a daily basis;

(c) Use the alerts to identify potentially stolen commercial metal property and nonferrous metal property; and

(d) Maintain for 90 days copies of any theft alerts received and downloaded pursuant to this section.

[ 2024 c 301 s 10; 2013 c 322 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.